District of Columbia statutes.
22-1005

Issuance of search warrants.

When complaint is made by any humane officer of the Washington Humane Society on oath or affirmation, to any magistrate authorized to issue warrants in criminal cases, that the complainant believes, and has reasonable cause to believe, that the laws in relation to cruelty to animals have been or are being violated in any particular building or place, such magistrate, if satisfied that there is reasonable cause for such belief, shall issue a search warrant, authorizing any marshal, deputy marshal, police officer, or any humane officer of the Washington Humane Society to search such building or place.

History

Aug. 23, 1871, Leg. Assem., p. 136, ch. 106, § 5
Feb. 13, 1885, 23 Stat. 302, ch. 58, § 1
Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1195, ch. 854, § 41
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-303, § 2(c), 47 DCR 7307

Cross References

Search warrants, see §§ 23-521 to 23-525.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-805.
1973 Ed., § 22-805.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-303 substituted “humane office” for “member” in two places.